Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202577-4003.01
Consumable material, defined.

Consumable material means any liquid solution or other material containing nicotine or a nicotine analogue that is depleted as an electronic nicotine delivery system is used.

Laws 2023, LB727, § 90;

Laws 2025, LB9, § 13.